Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-330 Claims of surety. Whenever
a creditor whose claim against an insurer is secured, in whole or in part, by
the undertaking of another person, fails to prove and file that claim, the
other person may do so in the creditor's name, and shall be subrogated to the
rights of the creditor, whether the claim has been filed by the creditor or by
the other person in the creditor's name, to the extent that the other person
discharges the undertaking. In the absence of an agreement with the creditor
to the contrary, the other person shall not be entitled to any distribution,
however, until the amount paid to the creditor on the undertaking plus the
distributions paid on the claim from the insurer's estate to the creditor
equals the amount of the entire claim of the creditor. Any excess received by
the creditor shall be held by the creditor in trust for such other person. The
term other person as used in this section is not intended to apply to a
guaranty fund or association, or foreign guaranty association. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next